Delaware, session 153, SB307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 202, Title 26 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 202. Limitations on jurisdiction of Commission. (c) (1) The Commission shall have no jurisdiction over the operation of telephone service provided by cellular technology or by domestic public land mobile radio service or over the rates to be charged for such service or over property, property rights, equipment or facilities employed in such service. (2) Notwithstanding paragraph (c)(1) of this section, the Commission may, upon application, designate any provider or reseller of cellular or wireless telecommunications services as an eligible telecommunications carrier under 47 C.F.R. Â§ 54.201 for the purpose of providing federal Lifeline services. The Commission may promulgate regulations as necessary to implement this paragraph (c)(2). Section 2. This Act takes effect immediately and is to be implemented the earlier of the following: (1) 6 months from the date of the Actâs enactment. (2) Notice by the Commission published in the Register of Regulations that final regulations to implement this Act have been promulgated.